California, session 20252026, SB1355.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 38006 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 38005, to read:38006. (a) The governing board of a school district that establishes a security department pursuant to Section 38000, and the governing board or body of a local educational agency that enters into a contract on or after January 1, 2027, with a private licensed security agency to provide school security services, shall do both of the following:(1) Specify the parameters on the use of weapons, including, but not limited to, handcuffs, pepper spray, batons, and firearms, on a school campus.(2) Specify the roles and responsibilities of school administrators, school security department personnel employed pursuant to Section 38000, and contracted school security officers, as applicable, for purposes of ensuring the safety of personnel and pupils, consistent with assigning school administrators primary responsibility for deescalation.(b) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.SECTION 1.Section 1051 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1051.(a)An applicant for registration as a chiropractic corporation shall supply to the board all necessary and pertinent documents and information requested by the board concerning the applicant’s plan of operations.(b)The board shall provide forms of application.(c)If the board finds that the corporation is duly organized and existing pursuant to the General Corporation Law, that each officer as provided in Section 1055, director, shareholder and each employee who will render professional services is a licensed person as defined in the Professional Corporation Act, and that from the application it appears that the affairs of the corporation will be conducted in compliance with law and the rules and regulations of the board, the board shall upon payment of the registration fee in such amount as it may determine issue a certificate of registration.